Oklahoma, session 2025, SB171.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 93 of Title 73, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Department of Public Safety shall create a security plan for
the State Capitol Building and grounds. The plan shall be submitted
to the State Capitol Preservation Commission. An updated plan shall
be submitted every three (3) years.
The Department shall coordinate with the Office of Management
and Enterprise Services to implement and staff the approved security
plan.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 73 O.S. 2021, Section 176, is
amended to read as follows:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB171 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Section 176. A. There shall be established created within the
Legislative Service Bureau the position of a permanent legislative
liaison committee, composed of three (3) members from each house,
appointed by the President Pro Tempore and Speaker, respectively
Capitol Liaison to the State Capitol Preservation Commission. The
legislative liaison committee will Capitol Liaison shall keep the
Legislature properly advised as to the activities of the Oklahoma
Capitol Improvement Authority and the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services by making such reports as they deem the Capitol
Liaison deems necessary to the appropriate committees and leadership
of both houses. All legislative studies concerning the
responsibilities or activities of the Oklahoma Capitol Improvement
Authority or the Office of Management and Enterprise Services and
all studies of activities or projects relating to the Oklahoma State
Capitol Complex shall be considered by presented to the liaison
committee created by this section Capitol Liaison. The Oklahoma
Capitol Improvement Authority and the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services shall notify the membership of the legislative
liaison committee Capitol Liaison in advance of any meeting in which
official or formal action is to be taken by furnishing the proposed
agenda in writing at least twenty-four (24) hours in advance of such
meeting.
B. The Oklahoma Capitol Improvement Authority and the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services shall provide such information,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB171 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

reco rds, testimony, or recommendations as the committee Capitol
Liaison may require.
C. All proposals for enhancement, modification, preservation,
or restoration of the State Capitol Building and grounds shall be
submitted to the Capitol Liaison. The Capitol Liaison shall submit
all proposals to the State Capitol Preservation Commission for
approval.
D. All proposals for changes in overall allocation in the State
Capitol Building or parking shall be submitted to the Capitol
Liaison. The Capitol Liaison shall submit all proposals to the
State Capitol Preservation Commission for approval, as defined by
Sections 15.1 and 15.3 of this title.
E. The Capitol Liaison shall be the primary liaison for all
tenants that occupy space in the State Capitol Building.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 73 O.S. 2021, Section 345, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 345. A. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the Oklahoma Capitol Improvement Authority is
authorized to issue obligations to acquire real property, together
with improvements located thereon, and personal property to
construct improvements to real property and to provide funding for
repairs, refurbishments and improvements to real and personal
property of the State Capitol Building in a total amount not to
exceed One Hundred Twenty Million Dollars ($120,000,000.00). The
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB171 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

fund s shall be used for the renovation, repair and remodeling of the
State Capitol Building.
B. The Authority may hold title to the property and
improvements until such time as any obligations issued for this
purpose are retired or defeased and may lease the property and
improvements to the Office of Management and Enterprise Services.
Upon final redemption or defeasance of the obligations created
pursuant to this section, title to the property and improvements
shall be transferred from the Oklahoma Capitol Improvement Authority
to the Office of Management and Enterprise Services.
C. For the purposes of paying the costs for construction of the
real property and improvements, and providing funding for the
project authorized in subsection A of this section, and for the
purpose authorized in subsection D of this section, the Authority is
hereby authorized to borrow monies on the credit of the income and
revenues to be derived from the leasing of such property and
improvements and, in anticipation of the collection of such income
and revenues, to issue negotiable obligations in a total amount not
to exceed One Hundred Twenty Million Dollars ($120,000,000.00)
whether issued in one or more series. The Authority is authorized
to capitalize interest on the obligations issued pursuant to this
section for a period of not to exceed one (1) year from the date of
issuance. For subsequent fiscal years, it is the intent of the
Legislature to appropriate to the Office of Management and
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB171 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Ente rprise Services sufficient monies to make rental payments for
the purpose of retiring the obligations created pursuant to this
section. To the extent funds are available from the proceeds of the
borrowing authorized by this subsection, the Oklahoma Capitol
Improvement Authority shall provide for the payment of professional
fees and associated costs related to the project authorized in
subsection A of this section.
D. The Authority may issue obligations in one or more series
and in conjunction with other issues of the Authority. The
Authority is authorized to hire bond counsel, financial consultants,
and such other professionals as it may deem necessary to provide for
the efficient sale of the obligations and may utilize a portion of
the proceeds of any borrowing to create such reserves as may be
deemed necessary and to pay costs associated with the issuance and
administration of such obligations.
E. The obligations authorized under this section may be sold at
either competitive or negotiated sale, as determined by the
Authority, and in such form and at such prices as may be authorized
by the Authority. The Authority may enter into agreements with such
credit enhancers and liquidity providers as may be determined
necessary to efficiently market the obligations. The obligations
may mature and have such provisions for redemption as shall be
determined by the Authority, but in no event shall the final

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB171 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

matu rity of such obligations occur later than ten (10) years from
the first principal maturity date.
F. Any interest earnings on funds or accounts created for the
purposes of this section may be utilized as partial payment of the
annual debt service or for the purposes directed by the Authority.
G. The obligations issued under this section, the transfer
thereof and the interest earned on such obligations, including any
profit derived from the sale thereof, shall not be subject to
taxation of any kind by the State of Oklahoma this state, or by any
county, municipality or political subdivision therein.
H. The Authority may direct the investment of all monies in any
funds or accounts created in connection with the offering of the
obligations authorized under this section. Such investments shall
be made in a manner consistent with the investment guidelines of the
State Treasurer. The Authority may place additional restrictions on
the investment of such monies if necessary to enhance the
marketability of the obligations.
I. There is hereby created a State Capitol Repair Expenditure
Oversight Committee. The proceeds from the sale of obligations
issued pursuant to the provisions of this section and Section 1 of
Enrolled House Bill No. 3168 of the 2nd Session of the 55th Oklahoma
Legislature that are needed for repairs to the interior and exterior
of the State Capitol shall be subject to the approval of the State
Capitol Repair Expenditure Oversight Committee; provided, however,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB171 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the expenditure of those proceeds shall be subject to a request for
proposal process.
The Committee shall be composed of nine (9) members as follows:
1. Three persons to be appointed by the Governor, one of whom
shall serve as chair of the Committee;
2. Three legislators to be appointed by the Speaker of the
House of Representatives, two of whom shall be members of the
majority political party and one of whom shall be a member of the
minority political party; and
3. Three legislators to be appointed by the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate, two of whom shall be members of the majority
political party and one of whom shall be a member of the minority
political party. Five members of the Committee shall constitute a
quorum and the vote of five members shall be necessary for any
action taken by the Committee. The Committee shall be staffed by
employees of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services. The
Committee shall be subject to the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act.
J. The Committee shall deliver a preliminary plan for the
renovation, repair and remodeling of the State Capitol to the
Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services no
later than December 31, 2014. The preliminary plan shall include
the following components:
1. Establishment of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services’ goal and criteria for use by the vendor; and
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB171 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. Selection criteria for the design-build team vendor to be
selected through a Request For Proposal process.
K. Following receipt of the preliminary plan as approved by the
Committee, the Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall
solicit Requests For Proposals to select the vendor for the project.
L. The Committee shall deliver a final plan to the Director of
the Office of Management and Enterprise Services no later than June
30, 2015. The final plan shall include the following components:
1. Approval of the final scope of work developed by the vendor;
and
2. Approval of the project phasing developed by the vendor.
M. Following delivery of the final plan, the Committee shall
continue to oversee the expenditure of proceeds from the sale of
obligations issued pursuant to the provisions of this section and
Section 1 of Enrolled House Bill No. 3168 of the 2nd Session of the
55th Legislature, until completion of the renovation, repair and
remodeling of the State Capitol. The Committee may also propose and
approve amendments to the plan as it deems appropriate.
N. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services shall have responsibility to substantially implement the
plan as presented by the Committee; provided, the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate or the Speaker of the House of Representatives
shall approve all proposed designs related to renovation, repair and
remodeling of space within the State Capitol Building under the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB171 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

mana gement and control of the Legislature and allocated to that
officer’s house of the Legislature pursuant to the provisions of
Section 15.1 of this title, and any subsequent changes to such
plans. Joint approval of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate
and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall be required
for such plans for space under the management and control of the
Legislature and not allocated to a specific house of the
Legislature. Such approval shall be in writing.
O. Insofar as they are not in conflict with the provisions of
this section, the provisions of Section 151 et seq. of this title
shall apply to this section.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 4101, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4101. As used in Sections 4101 through 4108 4110.1 of
this title:
1. “Public areas” means those areas in the State Capitol
Building open to the general public for general visitation; and
2. “Art” means fine art of museum quality representing the
highest quality of art objects available to include paintings,
murals, graphic arts, art photography and sculpture, aesthetically
aligned with recognized values, created by the conscious use of
skill and creative imagination;
3. “Design standards” means a document that is produced for the
purpose of guiding review of proposed alterations to the State
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB171 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Capi tol Building, grounds, and Governor’s Mansion. Design standards
shall establish the acceptable level of finishes for the historic
fabrics, features, and materials in use in the State Capitol
Building, and specify alterations which, if followed, will provide
compatible design;
4. “Enhancement” means an increase or improvement upon the
quality, value, or extent of the original design intent of the State
Capitol Building, grounds, or Governor’s Mansion;
5. “Grounds” means all land surrounding the State Capitol
Building and bordered by Lincoln Boulevard;
6. “Maintenance” means keeping spaces, structures, and
infrastructure in proper operating condition in a routine,
scheduled, or anticipated fashion to prevent failure or degradation;
7. “Modification” means any change to an existing physical
attribute of the State Capitol Building, grounds, or Governor’s
Mansion;
8. “Preservation” means the act or process of applying measures
necessary to sustain the existing form, integrity, and materials of
a historic property including preliminary measures to protect and
stabilize the property, and focusing upon the ongoing maintenance
and repair of historic materials and features, rather than extensive
replacement and new construction; and
9. “Restoration” means the act or process of accurately
depicting the form, features, and character of the State Capitol
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB171 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Buil ding as the building appeared in 1917, and the dome in 2002, by
means of the removal of features from later periods in its history
and reconstruction of missing features from the restoration period.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 4102, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 15, O.S.L. 2024 (74 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 4102), is amended to read as follows:
Section 4102. There is hereby re-created the State Capitol
Preservation Commission which shall be responsible for planning and
supervising the preservation and restoration of the interior and
exterior of the State Capitol Building, hereinafter referred to as
the Capitol, and the Governor’s Mansion. The Commission shall
control the display of art objects in public areas of the Capitol
jointly controlled by the Senate and the House of Representatives
and in the Governor’s Mansion. The State Capitol Preservation
Commission shall provide the highest-quality maintenance,
restoration, preservation, enhancement, and modification of and
long-term planning for the interior and exterior of the State
Capitol Building and grounds for the perpetual use by the state
government and the enjoyment of all persons.
SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 4103, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4103. A. The State Capitol Preservation Commission
shall be composed of fifteen (15) members as follows:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB171 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. Three members shall be appointed by the The Governor, or a
designee;
2. One member to be appointed by the Governor;
2. 3. Three members shall be appointed by the The Secretary of
State, or a designee;
4. The President Pro Tempore of the Senate, or a designee;
3. 5. Three members shall be appointed by the The Speaker of
the House of Representatives, or a designee;
4. 6. One member shall be appointed by the The Chief Justice of
the Oklahoma Supreme Court, or a designee; and
5. 7. One member of the Senate appointed by the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate;
8. One former member of the Senate appointed by the President
Pro Tempore of the Senate;
9. One member of the House of Representatives appointed by the
Speaker of the House of Representatives;
10. One former member of the House of Representatives appointed
by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and
11. The following shall be ex officio nonvoting members:
a. Chairman the Executive Director of the Oklahoma Arts
Council, or a designee,
b. President the Executive Director of the Oklahoma
Historical Society, or a designee,
c. the Capitol Architect and Curator,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB171 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

d. Superintendent of the Capitol the Capitol Liaison, and
e. the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services, or a designee.
B. The initial term of office of the appointed members shall be
as follows:
1. One of the members appointed by the Governor, the President
Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, and the member appointed by the Chief Justice of
the Oklahoma Supreme Court shall serve a one-year term;
2. One of the members appointed by the Governor, the President
Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives shall serve a three-year term; and
3. One of the members appointed by the Governor, the President
Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives shall serve a five-year term.
The term of office for each successor shall be for five (5)
years. Any member of the Legislature who is appointed to the
Commission shall serve only as long as the member is a member of the
respective house from which the member was appointed. All appointed
voting and ex officio nonvoting members of the State Capitol
Preservation Commission shall serve at the pleasure of their
appointing authority.
C. The Commission shall elect a chair and a vice-chair from its
membership to serve for a period of two (2) years. The first chair
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB171 SFLR Page 13
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

of t he Commission shall be the Governor, or a designee, who shall
serve a term of two (2) years. Thereafter, the chair of the
Commission shall rotate between the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate, or a designee, the Speaker of the House of Representatives,
or a designee, and the Governor, or a designee, for two-year
increments in perpetuity. Members of the Commission shall not be
compensated except for reimbursement as provided in the State Travel
Reimbursement Act.
D. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall make
the necessary arrangements for support services for the State
Capitol Preservation Commission. The State Capitol Preservation
Commission shall meet at least once per quarter and at the call of
the chair as needed. A quorum of the voting members shall be
present for any action taken. A quorum is the majority of the
appointed voting members. The Commission shall be subject to the
Oklahoma Open Meeting Act.
E. The Commission functions performed by the Governor,
President Pro Tempore of the Senate, Speaker of the House of
Representatives, Secretary of State, and appointed Senators and
Representatives are additional functions of their other public
offices and duties.
SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 4104, is
amended to read as follows:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB171 SFLR Page 14
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Section 4104. A. The State Capitol Preservation Commission
shall provide oversight to the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services on duties for management and maintenance of the State
Capitol Building and shall:
1. Research, plan, and have control of modifications and decor
of the interior and exterior of Approve the restoration,
preservation, enhancement, or modification of the State Capitol
Building, grounds, and the Governor’s Mansion;
2. Establish standards for the acquisition and display of works
of art for public display in the Capitol Review and approve the
annual budget and the long-range master plan submitted by the Office
of Management and Enterprise Services for the State Capitol
Building, grounds, and the Governor’s Mansion and select such works.
Such works of art shall be directly related to the history and
culture of the State of Oklahoma;
3. Establish procedures by which private contributions of
suitable art can be accepted for the Capitol and the Governor’s
Mansion. The Commission is authorized to accept and make proper
disposition of works of art as may be donated to the Commission and
this state;
4. Have authority to approve and submit to the Long-Range
Capital Planning Commission any proposed modification, alteration,
renovation, repair, or construction on any part of the Capitol and
the Governor’s Mansion Review and approve all requests for
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB171 SFLR Page 15
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

pres ervation, restoration, enhancement, and modification to the
State Capitol Building, grounds, and Governor’s Mansion submitted by
the Capitol Liaison. This review and approval process shall not
apply to actions deemed by the State Capitol Building Superintendent
to be maintenance necessary for the upkeep and function of the State
Capitol Building, grounds, and Governor’s Mansion; and
4. Review and approve a security plan submitted by the
Department of Public Safety for the State Capitol Building, grounds,
and Governor’s Mansion;
5. Have final approval authority for any plans or programs for
the restoration, preservation, or display of fine art programs in
and surrounding the State Capitol Building and the Governor’s
Mansion;
6. Review and approve administrative rules submitted by the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services or the Capitol Liaison
concerning the State Capitol Building, its contents, and its
concerns;
7. Review and approve preservation zones and design standards
for the State Capitol Building, grounds, and Governor’s Mansion;
8. Review and approve standards for the selection,
contributions, and acquisition of works of art and monuments for
permanent and temporary public display in the public spaces
controlled jointly by the Senate and the House of Representatives in

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB171 SFLR Page 16
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the State Capitol Building. Such works of art shall be directly
related to the history and culture of this state; and
9. Provide oversight and accountability inspections of
maintenance, restoration, preservation, enhancement, and
modification projects to ensure all projects conform to design
standards.
B. The Long-Range Capital Planning Commission shall submit any
capital construction or renovation project with respect to the State
Capitol or the Governor’s Mansion to the State Capitol Preservation
Commission for its advisory opinion prior to consideration by the
Long-Range Capital Planning Commission On and after the effective
date of this act, the State Capitol Preservation Commission shall
assume oversight responsibility for restoration projects for the
State Capitol Building and the Governor’s Mansion from the State
Capitol Repair Expenditure Oversight Committee created in Section
345 of Title 73 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 4105, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4105. There is hereby established the position of the
Capitol Architect and Curator who shall:
1. Develop the technical plans and programs for consideration
by the State Capitol Preservation Commission and the Long-Range
Capital Planning Commission with regard to restoration, renovation,

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB171 SFLR Page 17
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

and preservation of the State Capitol Building and the Governor’s
Mansion;
2. Develop and enforce standards adopted for acquisition and
display of works of art in and surrounding Advise the State Capitol
Preservation Commission regarding the space demands of the various
agencies in the State Capitol Building and the Governor’s Mansion;
3. Coordinate space demands of the various agencies in the
Capitol and the Governor’s Mansion;
4. Maintain a record of all structural and decor changes made
in the State Capitol Building and the Governor’s Mansion; and
5. 4. Make recommendations to the State Capitol Preservation
Commission for design standards and of necessary action on proposed
restoration, preservation, enhancement, and modifications in decor
or design to ensure preservation and maintenance of the cultural and
historic integrity of the State Capitol Building and the Governor’s
Mansion; and
5. Make recommendations to the State Capitol Preservation
Commission for preservation zones and design standards.
The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services
may contract for the services of a Capitol Architect and Curator or
employ such an individual on either a full- or part-time basis.
Compensation for the position will be in accord with similar
professional positions in state government.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB171 SFLR Page 18
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4105.1 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The State Capitol Building duties of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services (OMES) are as follows:
1. OMES shall have the responsibility for maintenance,
restoration, preservation, enhancement, and modification of the
State Capitol Building, grounds, and Governor’s Mansion including
facilities planning, facilities construction, and facilities
administration;
2. OMES shall be responsible for all maintenance duties
necessary to properly preserve and maintain the State Capitol
Building, grounds, and Governor’s Mansion;
3. OMES shall be responsible for devising and developing
processes for tenants in the State Capitol Building to submit
requests for maintenance, restoration, preservation, enhancement,
and modification and evaluating such requests;
4. OMES shall manage each project, except in State Capitol
Building areas allotted to the Senate and the House of
Representatives as defined in Section 15.1 of Title 73 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, to ensure execution of the highest-quality work
product, time-cost schedules, and efficient contract performance;
5. OMES shall be responsible for producing an annual budget and
submitting it to the State Capitol Preservation Commission;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB171 SFLR Page 19
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

6. OMES shall be responsible for creating a long-range master
plan for the maintenance and upkeep of the State Capitol Building
and grounds which shall be submitted to the State Capitol
Preservation Commission every three (3) years;
7. OMES shall contract with the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation
Department and Oklahoma Arts Council to operate the visitor center,
visitor relations activities, and tours in the State Capitol
Building;
8. OMES shall be responsible for operation of all dining and
vending services in the State Capitol Building and shall approve
food trucks and other mobile food preparation vehicles on the
grounds unless approved by the Legislature;
9. OMES shall be responsible for taking and approving
reservations in all meeting rooms and areas of the State Capitol
Building and grounds and shall seek approval from the Senate, House
of Representatives, or jointly for space allocated to the
Legislature by Section 15.1 of Title 73 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
10. OMES shall coordinate with the Oklahoma Arts Council for
curation of and care for artwork in the State Art Collection,
Capitol Art Collection, and monuments, memorials, and all temporary
exhibits in public areas at the State Capitol Building and grounds;
11. OMES shall be responsible for submitting proposed
administrative rules to the State Capitol Preservation Commission to
govern the execution of these duties;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB171 SFLR Page 20
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

12. OMES may collect rent from third-party vendors in the State
Capitol Building and proceeds from the sales of merchandise or
services rendered;
13. OMES shall have the authority to respond promptly to
emergency maintenance needs as they arise;
14. OMES shall serve as the primary contact for Americans with
Disabilities Act of 1990 (ADA) compliance for the State Capitol
Building; and
15. OMES shall collaborate with the Department of
Transportation for all maintenance, upkeep, and access to all
parking lots on the grounds of the State Capitol Building.
B. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall
employ all staff and consultants necessary to perform the duties of
OMES including, but not limited to, a licensed architect.
SECTION 10. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 4108, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4108. The provisions of Sections 4101 through 4107
4110.1 of this title shall apply to all modifications in the
structure or decor of the State Capitol Building, grounds, and the
Governor’s Mansion except for those immediate emergency repairs
needed to prevent loss or damage to property or to protect the
health and safety of the public during use of the building and any
art displayed on the grounds.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB171 SFLR Page 21
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 11. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4108.1 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Oklahoma Arts Council shall be given the responsibility to
acquire, maintain, preserve, or restore any state-owned art in the
State Art Collection or Capitol Art Collection that is in storage or
on display in the State Capitol Building and grounds. The council
is authorized to hold exhibitions and commissions to display art to
the general public. The Oklahoma Arts Council may request direct
appropriations or submit requests to the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services.
SECTION 12. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 4109, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4109. By the order of the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services, restoration and preservation
Maintenance, restoration, preservation, enhancement, and
modification projects of the State Capitol Building, grounds, or of
the Governor’s Mansion may be exempted from the provisions of the
Public Competitive Bidding Act of 1974, Section 101 et seq. of Title
61 of the Oklahoma Statutes. For exempted State Capitol Building or
Governor’s Mansion construction projects, the Office of Management
and Enterprise Services shall select among contractors qualified by
past experience to conduct historical preservation projects.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB171 SFLR Page 22
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 13. REPEALER 74 O.S. 2021, Sections 4106 and
4107, are hereby repealed.
SECTION 14. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON RETIREMENT AND GOVERNMENT
RESOURCES
February 19, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED
















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB171 SFLR Page 23
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)